District of Columbia statutes.
46-302.01

Repealed

Bases for jurisdiction over nonresident.

Repealed.

Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 201, 42 DCR 6748
June 22, 2006, D.C. Law 16-137, § 2(b)(1)(B), 53 DCR 3634
Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-73, § 902, 63 DCR 222
1981 Ed., § 30-342.1.
D.C. Law 16-137, designated the existing text as subsec. (a); in the lead-in language to subsec. (a), substituted “establish or enforce” for “establish, enforce, or modify”; in par. (a)(2), substituted “consent in a record” for “consent”; and added subsec. (b).
Applicability: Section 3 of D.C. Law 16-137 provided: “This act shall apply as of April 1, 2007.”
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 201 of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act (2001 Act).